Maryland, session 2026, HB1376.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(k) “Special pediatric hospital” means a facility in the State that provides
nonacute medical, rehabilitation, therapy, and palliative services to individuals:
(1) Under the age of 22 years; or
(2) Who are at least 2 years old and under the age of 23 years and have
co–occurring physical and behavioral health conditions.
15–102.3.

HOUSE BILL 1376 3
(m) Beginning January 1, 2026, the provisions of § 15–861 of the Insurance Article
apply to managed care organizations in the same manner that they apply to carriers.
[(n)] (M) Beginning January 1, 2026, the provisions of § 15–862 of the Insurance
Article apply to managed care organizations in the same manner that they apply to carriers.
[(o)] (N) The provisions of § 15–863 of the Insurance Article apply to managed
care organizations in the same manner they apply to carriers.
15–103.
(a) (1) The Secretary shall administer the Maryland Medical Assistance
Program.
(2) The Program:
(xxvi) Beginning on January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for a
transfer to a special pediatric hospital in accordance with § 15–861 of the Insurance Article
§ 15–158 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
15–158.
(A) (1) [The] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
Program and the Maryland Children’s Health Program may not require prior authorization
for a transfer to a special pediatric hospital.
(2) AT THE REQUEST OF A SPECIAL PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL, THE
PROGRAM AND THE MARYLAND CHILDREN’S HEALTH PROGRAM SHALL PROVIDE A
PRIOR AUTHORIZATION DETERMINATION REGARDING A TRANSFER TO A SPECIAL
PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL WITHIN 2 3 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE REQUEST IS
RECEIVED.
(B) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
ADOPT REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING A RETROSPECTIVE REVIEW PROCESS FOR
SPECIAL PEDIATRIC HOSPITALS.
(2) THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE FOR A PEER–TO–PEER RECONSIDERATION OF A
MEDICAL NECESSITY DETERMINATION MADE BY THE DEPARTMENT OR ITS AGENT
ON REQUEST OF A PEDIATRIC SPECIALTY HOSPITAL;
(II) PROVIDE FOR RETROSPECTIVE REVIEW OF ANY MEDICAL
NECESSITY DETERMINATION ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT OR ITS AGENT DENYING:

HOUSE BILL 1376
1. ADMISSION TO A SPECIAL PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL ON
OR AFTER JULY JANUARY 1, 2025; OR
2. REIMBURSEMENT FOR INPATIENT SERVICES OR
OUTPATIENT SERVICES PROVIDED BY A SPECIAL PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL ON OR AFTER
JULY JANUARY 1, 2025;
(III) COMPLY WITH TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE; AND
(IV) PROVIDE THAT THE RETROSPECTIVE REVIEW PROCESS BE
CONDUCTED BY A LICENSED PHYSICIAN.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ADMINISTRATIVE DAY” MEANS A DAY DURING WHICH A HEALTH
CARE PROVIDER DELIVERS CARE TO A PATIENT WHO NO LONGER REQUIRES CARE
FROM THE PROVIDER BUT WHO THE PROVIDER IS UNABLE TO DISCHARGE OR
TRANSFER TO ANOTHER CARE SETTING.
(3) “MEDICALLY NECESSARY” MEANS THAT CARE IS:
(I) DIRECTLY RELATED TO DIAGNOSTIC, PREVENTIVE,
CURATIVE, PALLIATIVE, REHABILITATIVE, OR AMELIORATIVE TREATMENT OF AN
ILLNESS, AN INJURY, A DISABILITY, OR ANY HEALTH CONDITION;
(II) CONSISTENT WITH ACCEPTED STANDARDS OF GOOD
MEDICAL PRACTICE; AND
(III) NOT PRIMARILY FOR THE CONVENIENCE OF THE PATIENT,
THE PATIENT’S FAMILY, OR THE PROVIDER.
(B) The Program and the Maryland Children’s Health Program [may]:
(1) MAY not require prior authorization for a transfer to a special pediatric
hospital; BUT
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, SHALL PROVIDE
A PRIOR AUTHORIZATION DETERMINATION FOR A TRANSFER TO A SPECIAL
PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL ON REQUEST OF THE SPECIAL PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OR THE
REFERRING HEALTH CARE PROVIDER.

HOUSE BILL 1376 5
(C) IF THE PROGRAM OR MARYLAND CHILDREN’S HEALTH PROGRAM
RECEIVE A REQUEST UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(2) OF THIS SECTION, THE PROGRAM
OR MARYLAND CHILDREN’S HEALTH PROGRAM SHALL PROVIDE THE PRIOR
AUTHORIZATION DETERMINATION WITHIN 3 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE REQUEST IS
RECEIVED.
(D) (1) (I) IF A SPECIAL PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OR A REFERRING
HEALTH CARE PROVIDER DISAGREES WITH A DETERMINATION BY THE PROGRAM OR
MARYLAND’S CHILDREN HEALTH PROGRAM THAT A TRANSFER TO A SPECIAL
PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL IS NOT MEDICALLY NECESSARY, THE SPECIAL PEDIATRIC
HOSPITAL OR THE REFERRING HEALTH CARE PROVIDER MAY REQUEST A
RETROSPECTIVE REVIEW BY THE PROGRAM OR MARYLAND CHILDREN’S HEALTH
PROGRAM IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(II) THE PROGRAM OR MARYLAND CHILDREN’S HEALTH
PROGRAM SHALL CONDUCT A REQUESTED RETROSPECTIVE REVIEW EVEN IF THE
ENROLLEE WILL NOT BENEFIT FINANCIALLY FROM THE OUTCOME OF THE APPEAL.
(2) IF A SPECIAL PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OR A REFERRING HEALTH
CARE PROVIDER REQUESTS A RETROSPECTIVE REVIEW UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, THE SPECIAL PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OR THE REFERRING HEALTH
CARE PROVIDER SHALL BE REIMBURSED FOR ALL ADMINISTRATIVE DAYS AT THE
APPLICABLE RATE FROM THE DATE OF THE MEDICAL NECESSITY DETERMINATION
UNTIL THE CONCLUSION OF THE RETROSPECTIVE REVIEW.
Article – Insurance
15–861.
(a) (1) In this section[, “special] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) “ADMINISTRATIVE DAY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 15–158
OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(3) “MEDICALLY NECESSARY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 15–158
OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(4) “SPECIAL pediatric hospital” has the meaning stated in § 15–101 of
the Health – General Article.
(b) This section applies to:

HOUSE BILL 1376
(1) insurers and nonprofit health service plans that provide hospital,
medical, or surgical benefits to individuals or groups on an expense–incurred basis under
health insurance policies or contracts that are issued or delivered in the State; and
(2) health maintenance organizations that provide hospital, medical, or
surgical benefits to individuals or groups under contracts that are issued or delivered in
the State.
(c) An entity subject to this section:
(1) may not require prior authorization for a transfer to a special pediatric
hospital; BUT
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, SHALL PROVIDE
A PRIOR AUTHORIZATION DETERMINATION FOR A TRANSFER TO A SPECIAL
PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL ON REQUEST OF A SPECIAL PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OR A
REFERRING HEALTH CARE PROVIDER.
(D) IF AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION RECEIVES A REQUEST UNDER
SUBSECTION (C)(2) OF THIS SECTION, THE ENTITY SHALL PROVIDE THE PRIOR
AUTHORIZATION DETERMINATION WITHIN 3 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE REQUEST IS
RECEIVED.
(E) (1) IF A SPECIAL PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OR A REFERRING HEALTH
CARE PROVIDER DISAGREES WITH A DETERMINATION BY THE ENTITY THAT A
TRANSFER TO A SPECIAL PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL IS NOT MEDICALLY NECESSARY, THE
SPECIAL PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OR THE REFERRING HEALTH CARE PROVIDER MAY
REQUEST A RETROSPECTIVE REVIEW BY THE ENTITY THAT MADE THE
DETERMINATION.
(2) THE ENTITY THAT IS REQUESTED TO CONDUCT THE
RETROSPECTIVE REVIEW SHALL CONDUCT THE REVIEW EVEN IF THE INSURED WILL
NOT BENEFIT FINANCIALLY FROM THE OUTCOME OF THE APPEAL.
(3) IF A SPECIAL PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OR A REFERRING HEALTH
CARE PROVIDER REQUESTS A RETROSPECTIVE REVIEW UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, THE SPECIAL PEDIATRIC HOSPITAL OR THE REFERRING HEALTH
CARE PROVIDER SHALL BE REIMBURSED FOR ALL ADMINISTRATIVE DAYS AT THE
APPLICABLE RATE FROM THE DATE OF THE MEDICAL NECESSITY DETERMINATION
UNTIL THE CONCLUSION OF THE RETROSPECTIVE REVIEW.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2027.

HOUSE BILL 1376 7
SECTION 3. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027 July 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.